Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-912.01
Juvenile; escapes; prohibited acts; penalty.

Any person who entices or attempts to entice a juvenile away from a facility or program when the juvenile has been legally placed with or committed to the Office of Juvenile Services or who knowingly harbors, transports, conceals, or aids in harboring, transporting, or concealing any juvenile who has escaped from the custody of the Office of Juvenile Services is guilty of a Class IV felony.

Laws 1901, c. 51, § 12, p. 408;

R.S.1913, § 7380;

C.S.1922, § 7039;

C.S.1929, § 83-1110;

R.S.1943, § 83-473;

Laws 1969, c. 817, § 81, p. 3111;

Laws 1977, LB 39, § 315;

Laws 1993, LB 31, § 45;

Laws 1994, LB 988, § 36;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 83-473;

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 9.